Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2012
71-9104
Schools; duties; participant on athletic
team; actions required; notice to parent or guardian; effect of signature
of licensed health care professional.

(1) Each approved or accredited public,
private, denominational, or parochial school shall:

(a) Make available
training approved by the chief medical officer on how to recognize the symptoms
of a concussion or brain injury and how to seek proper medical treatment for
a concussion or brain injury to all coaches of school athletic teams; and

(b) Require
that concussion and brain injury information be provided on an annual basis
to students and the students' parents or guardians prior to such students
initiating practice or competition. The information provided to students and
the students' parents or guardians shall include, but need not be limited
to:

(i)
The signs and symptoms of a concussion;

(ii) The risks posed by sustaining a concussion;
and

(iii) The actions a student should take in response to sustaining
a concussion, including the notification of his or her coaches.

(2)(a) A student
who participates on a school athletic team shall be removed from a practice
or game when he or she is reasonably suspected of having sustained a concussion
or brain injury in such practice or game after observation by a coach or a
licensed health care professional who is professionally affiliated with or
contracted by the school. Such student shall not be permitted to participate
in any school supervised team athletic activities involving physical exertion,
including, but not limited to, practices or games, until the student (i) has
been evaluated by a licensed health care professional, (ii) has received written
and signed clearance to resume participation in athletic activities from the
licensed health care professional, and (iii) has submitted the written and
signed clearance to resume participation in athletic activities to the school
accompanied by written permission to resume participation from the student's
parent or guardian.

(b) If a student is reasonably suspected after observation of having
sustained a concussion or brain injury and is removed from an athletic activity
under subdivision (2)(a) of this section, the parent or guardian of the student
shall be notified by the school of the date and approximate time of the injury
suffered by the student, the signs and symptoms of a concussion or brain injury
that were observed, and any actions taken to treat the student.

(c) Nothing in this subsection
shall be construed to require any school to provide for the presence of a
licensed health care professional at any practice or game.

(d) The signature of
an individual who represents that he or she is a licensed health care professional
on a written clearance to resume participation that is provided to a school
shall be deemed to be conclusive and reliable evidence that the individual
who signed the clearance is a licensed health care professional. The school
shall not be required to determine or verify the individual's qualifications.

Laws 2011, LB260, § 4.